Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3405
Witness; disqualification; declaration.

(1)(a) The following shall not qualify to witness a power of attorney for health care: Any person who at the time of witnessing is the principal's spouse, parent, child, grandchild, sibling, presumptive heir, known devisee, attending physician, mental health treatment team member, romantic or dating partner, or attorney in fact; or an employee of a life or health insurance provider for the principal.

(b) No more than one witness may be an administrator or employee of a health care provider who is caring for or treating the principal.

(2) Each witness shall make the written declaration in substantially the form prescribed in section 30-3408.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB247, § 17.